Hawaii statutes.
WITHHOLDING
AND COLLECTION OF TAX AT SOURCE

§235-61 Withholding of tax on wages.
(a) As used in this section:

(1) "Wages" means wages, commissions, fees,
salaries, bonuses, and every and all other kinds of remuneration for, or
compensation attributable to, services performed by an employee for the
employee's employer, including the cash value of all remuneration paid in any
medium other than cash and the cost-of-living allowances and other payments
included in gross income by section 235-7(b), but excluding income excluded
from gross income by section 235-7 or other provisions of this chapter;

(2) "Employee" includes an officer or
elected official, or any other employee;

(3) "Employer" means (A) the person or
government for whom an individual performs or performed any service, of
whatever nature, as the employee of such person or government, and (B) the
person having control of the payment of the wages if the employer as heretofore
defined does not have control thereof, and (C) any person subject to the
jurisdiction of the State and paying wages on behalf of an employer as
heretofore defined if the employer is not subject to the jurisdiction of the
State; provided that the term employer shall not include any government that is
not subject to the laws of the State except as, and to the extent that, it
consents to the application of sections 235-61 to 235-67 to it.

(b) Every employer, as defined herein, making
payment of wages, as herein defined, to employees, shall deduct and withhold
from such wages an amount of tax determined as provided in this section.

(c) For each withholding period (whether
weekly, biweekly, monthly, or otherwise) the amount of tax to be withheld under
this section shall be at a rate which, for the taxable year, will yield the tax
imposed by section 235-51 upon each employee's annual wage, as estimated from
the employee's current wage in any withholding period, but for the purposes of
this subsection of the rates provided by section 235-51 the maximum to be taken
into consideration shall be eight per cent. The tax for the taxable year shall
be calculated upon the following assumptions:

(1) That the employee's annual wage, as estimated
from the employee's current wage in the withholding period, will be the
employee's sole income for the taxable year;

(2) That there will be no deductions therefrom in
determining adjusted gross income;

(3) That in determining taxable income there shall be
a standard deduction allowance which shall be an amount equal to one exemption
(or more than one exemption if so prescribed by the director) unless (A) the
taxpayer is married and the taxpayer's spouse is an employee receiving wages
subject to withholding, or (B) the taxpayer has withholding exemption
certificates in effect with respect to more than one employer. For the
purposes of this section, any standard deduction allowance under this paragraph
shall be treated as if it were denominated a withholding exemption;

(4) That in determining taxable income there also
will be deducted the amount of exemptions and withholding allowances granted to
the employee in the computation of taxable income, as shown by a certificate to
be filed with the employer as provided by subsection (f); and

(5) If it appears from the certificate filed pursuant
to subsection (f) that the employee, under section 235-93, is entitled to make
a joint return, that the employee and the employee's spouse will so elect.

(d) Alternatively, at the election of the
employer, the employer may deduct and withhold from each employee an amount of
tax determined on the basis of tables to be prepared and furnished by the
department of taxation, which amount of tax shall be substantially equivalent
to the amount of tax provided by subsection (c) hereof.

(e) The department, by rule, may require the
deduction and withholding of tax from any remuneration or compensation paid for
or attributable to services that are not subject to the general excise tax
imposed by chapter 237, whether or not such withholding is provided for
hereinabove. Every person so required to deduct and withhold tax, or from whom
tax is required to be deducted and withheld, shall be subject to sections
235-61 to 235-67, and every person so required to deduct and withhold tax shall
be deemed an employer for the purposes of this chapter.

The department, by rule, may exempt any
employer from the requirement of deduction and withholding of taxes, even
though the requirement is imposed by this section, if and to the extent that
the department finds the requirement unduly onerous or impracticable of
enforcement.

(f) On or before the date of the commencement
of employment with an employer, the employee shall furnish the employer with a
signed certificate relating to the number of exemptions which the employee
claims, which shall in no event exceed the number to which the employee is
entitled on the basis of the existing facts, and also showing whether the
employee is married and is, under section 235-93, entitled to make a joint
return. The certificate shall be in such form and contain such information as
may be prescribed by the department.

If, on any day during the calendar year, there
is a change in the employee's marital status and the employee no longer is
entitled to make a joint return, or the number of exemptions to which the
employee is entitled is less than the number of exemptions claimed by the
employee on the certificate then in effect with respect to the employee, the
employee shall within ten days thereafter furnish the employer with a new
certificate showing the employee's present marital status, or relating to the
number of exemptions which the employee then claims, which shall in no event
exceed the number to which the employee is entitled on the basis of the
existing facts. If, on any day during the calendar year, there is a change in
the employee's marital status and though previously not entitled to make a
joint return the employee now is so entitled, or the number of exemptions to
which the employee is entitled is greater than the number of exemptions claimed,
the employee may furnish the employer with a new certificate showing the
employee's present marital status, or relating to the number of exemptions
which the employee then claims, which shall in no event exceed the number to
which the employee is entitled on the basis of the existing facts.

Such certificate shall take effect at the times
set forth in the Internal Revenue Code.

(g) In determining the deduction allowed by
subsection (c)(4) an employee shall be entitled to withholding allowances or
additional reductions in withholding under this subsection. In determining the
number of additional withholding allowances or the amount of additional
reductions in withholding under this subsection, the employee may take into
account (to the extent and in the manner provided by rules) estimated itemized
deductions and tax credits allowable under this chapter; and such additional
deductions and other items as may be specified by the director in rules. For
the purposes of this subsection a fractional number shall not be taken into
account unless it amounts to one-half or more, in which case it shall be
increased to the next whole number.

(1) As used in this subsection, unless the context
otherwise requires:

(A) "Estimated itemized deductions"
means the aggregate amount which the employee reasonably expects will be
allowed as deductions under sections 235-2.3, 235-2.4, 235-2.45, and 235-7,
other than the deductions referred to in Internal Revenue Code section 151 and
those deductions required to be taken into account in determining adjusted
gross income under Internal Revenue Code section 62(a) (with the exception of
paragraph 10 thereof) for the estimation year. In no case shall the aggregate
amount be greater than the sum of:

(i) The amount of the deductions reflected in
the employee's net income tax return for the taxable year preceding the
estimation year of (if a return has not been filed for the preceding taxable
year at the time the withholding exemption certificate is furnished the
employer) the second taxable year preceding the estimation year; or

(ii) The amount of estimated itemized
deductions and tax credits allowable under this chapter and any additional
deductions to which entitled; and

(iii) The amount of the employee's determinable
additional deductions for the estimation year.

(B) "Estimated wages" means the
aggregate amount which the employee reasonably expects will constitute wages
for the estimation year;

(C) "Determinable additional
deductions" means those estimated itemized deductions which:

(i) Are in excess of the deductions referred
to in subparagraph (A) reflected on the employee's net income tax return for
the taxable year preceding the estimation year; and

(ii) Are demonstrably attributable to an
identifiable event during the estimation year or the preceding taxable year
which can reasonably be expected to cause an increase in the amount of such
deductions on the net income tax return for the estimation year.

(D) "Estimation year", in the case
of an employee who files the employee's return on the basis of a calendar year,
means the calendar year in which the wages are paid; provided that in the case
of an employee who files the employee's return on a basis other than the
calendar year, the employee's estimation year, and the amounts deducted and
withheld to be governed by the estimation year, shall be determined under rules
prescribed by the director of taxation.

(2) Under this subsection, the following special
rules shall apply:

(A) Married individuals. The number of
withholding allowances to which a husband and wife are entitled under this
subsection shall be determined on the basis of their combined wages and
deductions. This subparagraph shall not apply to a husband and wife who filed
separate returns for the taxable year preceding the estimation year and who
reasonably expect to file separate returns for the estimation year;

(B) Limitation. In the case of employees
whose estimated wages are at levels at which the amounts deducted and withheld
under this chapter generally are insufficient (taking into account a reasonable
allowance for deductions and exceptions) to offset the liability for tax under
this chapter with respect to the wages from which the amounts are deducted and
withheld, the director may by rule reduce the withholding allowances to which
those employees would, but for this subparagraph, be entitled under this
subsection;

(C) Treatment of allowances. For purposes of
this chapter, any withholding allowance under this subsection shall be treated as
if it were denominated a withholding exemption.

(3) The director may prescribe tables by rule under
chapter 91 pursuant to which employees shall determine the number of
withholding allowances to which they are entitled under this subsection.

(h) The director of taxation may adopt by rule
under chapter 91 the rules and regulations promulgated by the United States
Secretary of Treasury or a delegate of the Secretary relating to the provisions
of subtitle C, chapter 24 of the Internal Revenue Code operative in this
section. [L Sp 1957, c 1, pt of §2; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §16; am L 1965, c
155, §31(d); Supp, §121-16; HRS §235-61; am L 1981, c 138, §1; am L 1982, c 23,
§1; am L 1983, c 206, §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 239, §1(17), (18); am L
1993, c 73, §4; am L 1995, c 92, §7; am L 1996, c 187, §6; am L 2001, c 199,
§5]

Case Notes

Statute did not apply, where defendants United States,
director of taxation, and director of labor and industrial relations sought
taxes that principal (subcontractor) failed to remit at the time it controlled
its funds and payment of wages; because unpaid taxes accrued when principal had
control over its payment of wages, plaintiff surety (which issued
subcontractor's performance and payment bond) may not be held liable for these
funds. 67 F. Supp. 2d 1183.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next